Illinois, session 104th, SB2881.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/1-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Criminal Code of 2012. 9(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13.)